Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB523.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Health screenings for firefighters and EMS providers.(a) Cancer and cardiovascular health screening exams.--A firefighter or EMS provider employed as a full-time paid employee of a fire department or a political subdivision shall have a cancer and cardiovascular health screening exam conducted by a physician no less than once every three years during the course of the firefighter's or EMS provider's employment. Where applicable, a health screening under this section shall include, at a minimum:(1) Screenings for the following cancers and 123456789101112131415161718 cardiovascular conditions:(i) Liver.(ii) Gallbladder.(iii) Kidney.(iv) Spleen.(v) Urinary bladder and prostate.(vi) Abdominal aorta.(vii) Testicle and scrotal.(viii) Pelvic, uterus and ovary external scan.(ix) Thyroid.(x) Carotid.(xi) Colon.(xii) Lung.(xiii) Skin.(2) An echocardiogram.(3) For a male, a prostate-specific antigen screening.(4) For a female, a human papillomavirus screening.(b) Cost of health screenings.--All costs associated with a health screening under this section shall be covered by a health care benefits plan included with the firefighter's or EMS provider's employment, an insurance fund, joint insurance fund or other manner. An employer shall cover the cost of a copayment, deductible, coinsurance or employee out-of-pocket expense for a health screening under this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"EMS provider." Any of the following:(1) An emergency medical responder.(2) An emergency medical technician.20250SB0523PN0492 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) An advanced emergency medical technician.(4) A paramedic.(5) A prehospital registered nurse.(6) A prehospital physician extender.(7) A prehospital emergency medical services physician.(8) An individual prescribed by regulation of the Department of Health to provide specialized emergency medical services.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0523PN0492 - 3 - 123456789